Maryland, session 2026, SB0904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0904*

SENATE BILL 904
6–132.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SERVICE CONTRACT” MEANS A PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT FOR SERVICES THAT WILL BE PROVIDED TO A PUBLIC SCHOOL.
(B) A COUNTY BOARD THAT SEEKS TO ENTER INTO A SERVICE CONTRACT
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(C) THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A DEMONSTRATION THAT THE
COUNTY BOARD HAS TAKEN FORMAL AND POSITIVE STEPS TO CONSIDER
ALTERNATIVES TO THE SERVICE CONTRACT, INCLUDING REORGANIZATION AND
REEVALUATION OF SERVICES AND PERFORMANCE.
(D) (1) THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT CALCULATIONS THAT:
(I) COMPARE THE COST OF THE SERVICE CONTRACT WITH THE
COST OF USING SCHOOL EMPLOYEES; AND
(II) SHOW THE SAVINGS TO THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM, OVER
THE DURATION OF THE SERVICE CONTRACT, OF AT LEAST 20% OF THE CONTRACT,
EXCLUSIVE OF ANY SAVINGS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A REDUCTION IN EMPLOYEE PAY OR
FRINGE BENEFITS.
(2) IN CALCULATING THE COST COMPARISON REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) DIRECT COSTS, INCLUDING FRINGE BENEFITS;
(II) INDIRECT OVERHEAD COSTS, INCLUDING THE
PROPORTIONAL SHARE OF EXISTING ADMINISTRATIVE SALARIES AND BENEFITS,
RENT, EQUIPMENT COSTS, UTILITIES, AND MATERIALS, BUT ONLY TO THE EXTENT
THAT THOSE COSTS:
1. ARE ATTRIBUTABLE SOLELY TO THE SERVICE IN
QUESTION; AND
2. WOULD NOT EXIST IF THE SERVICES WERE NOT
PERFORMED BY SCHOOL EMPLOYEES;
(III) ANY CONTINUING OR TRANSITIONAL COSTS THAT WOULD
BE DIRECTLY ASSOCIATED WITH CONTRACTING FOR THE SERVICES, INCLUDING
UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION AND THE COST OF TRANSITIONAL SERVICES; AND

SENATE BILL 904 3
(IV) ADDITIONAL COSTS OF PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES BY
COUNTY BOARD EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING SALARIES AND BENEFITS OF ADDITIONAL
STAFF AND THE COST OF ADDITIONAL SPACE, EQUIPMENT, AND MATERIALS NEEDED
TO PERFORM THE SERVICES.
(E) (1) THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A FORMAL PLAN OF
ASSISTANCE FOR ALL SCHOOL EMPLOYEES WHO WILL BE ADVERSELY AFFECTED BY
THE SERVICE CONTRACT.
(2) THE PLAN OF ASSISTANCE SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) EFFORTS TO PLACE AFFECTED EMPLOYEES IN VACANT
POSITIONS IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) PROVISIONS IN THE SERVICE CONTRACT, IF FEASIBLE, FOR
THE HIRING BY THE CONTRACTOR OF DISPLACED EMPLOYEES; AND
(III) ADVANCE NOTIFICATION TO THE AFFECTED EMPLOYEES.
(F) (1) A SERVICE CONTRACT SHALL BE SUBJECT TO A DEPARTMENT
AUDIT TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH PROJECTED COST SAVINGS UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AUDIT FINDINGS FROM AN AUDIT CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE
PUBLIC.
6–133.
(A) (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT PARAEDUCATORS AND
OTHER EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS BENEFIT FROM IN–PERSON
TRAINING AS PART OF THE HIRING AND ONBOARDING PROCESS.
(2) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT IN–PERSON
TRAINING FOR PARAEDUCATORS AND OTHER EDUCATION SUPPORT
PROFESSIONALS BE EXPANDED IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS TO AT LEAST 2 DAYS OF
HIGH–QUALITY PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT DURING EACH SCHOOL YEAR.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS PARAGRAPH (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN AND
DEVELOP A NEW SYSTEM OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS

SENATE BILL 904
FOR PARAEDUCATORS AND OTHER EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS THAT IS
PAID AND OCCURS DURING WEEKDAY SCHOOL HOURS.
(2) THE NEW SYSTEM OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) TRAINING TO FACILITATE PARAEDUCATORS AND
TEACHERS WORKING AS A TEAM TO IMPROVE STUDENT OUTCOMES;
(II) TRAINING FOR EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS ON
HOW TO:
1. COLLABORATE WITH TEACHERS AND
PARAEDUCATORS TO IMPROVE STUDENT PERFORMANCE AND BEHAVIOR;
2. IMPROVE STUDENT HEALTH AND SAFETY; AND
3. IMPROVE STUDENT LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS,
INCLUDING SCHOOL BUILDINGS, SCHOOL BUSES, PLAYGROUNDS, ATHLETIC FIELDS,
SCHOOL CAFETERIAS, AND SCHOOL HEALTH FACILITIES;
(III) TRAINING FOR PARAEDUCATORS ON SAFE PHYSICAL
RESTRAINT;
(IV) TRAINING FOR EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS ON
CRISIS PREVENTION AND DE–ESCALATION; AND
(V) JOB SKILLS TRAINING APPROPRIATE FOR SPECIFIC
EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONAL GROUPS.
(3) (2) WHEN DESIGNING AND DEVELOPING THE SYSTEM OF
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH COUNTY BOARDS AND NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS WITH EXPERIENCE IN SUPPORTING EDUCATION SUPPORT
PROFESSIONALS, INCLUDING THE MARYLAND STATE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE
GUIDANCE TO EACH COUNTY BOARD THAT DESCRIBES THE SYSTEM OF
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT DEVELOPED AND DESIGNED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2028, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PROVIDE
THE SYSTEM OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT DESIGNED BY THE DEPARTMENT

SENATE BILL 904 5
UNDER THIS SECTION TO EACH PARAEDUCATOR AND EDUCATION SUPPORT
PROFESSIONAL WHO IS EMPLOYED IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY.
(E) (C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO DIMINISH THE
OBLIGATION OF A COUNTY BOARD TO COMPLY WITH A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT OR AN EMPLOYMENT BENEFIT PROGRAM THAT ESTABLISHES GREATER
REQUIREMENTS THAN IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.